Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 5. Presumptions

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

31A C.J.S. Evidence §§ 130 to 196.

§ 1-12-501.
Survivorship upon simultaneous death.

When two (2) persons perish in the same calamity and it is not shown who died first and there are no particular circumstances from which it can be inferred, survivorship is presumed from the probabilities resulting from the strength, age and sex, according to the following rules:

If both of those who have perished were under the age of fifteen (15) years, the older is presumed to have survived;

If both were of the age of sixty (60) years or older, the younger is presumed to have survived;

If one is under fifteen (15) years of age and the other is sixty (60) years of age or older, the former is presumed to have survived;

If both are fifteen (15) years of age or older and under sixty (60) years of age, and the sexes are different, the male is presumed to have survived. If the sexes are the same, the older will be presumed to have survived;

If one is under the age of fifteen (15) years or is sixty (60) years of age or older, and the other is between those ages, the latter is presumed to have survived.

History.

Laws 1897, ch. 3, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 4865; C.S. 1910, § 5734; C.S. 1920, § 7009; R.S. 1931, § 88-4008; C.S. 1945, § 6-2510; W.S. 1957, § 1-189; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-12-801.

Cross references. —

For Uniform Simultaneous Death Act, see chapter 13 of title 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Law reviews. —

See “Legislation,” 1 Wyo. L.J. 126.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Uniform Simultaneous Death Act generally, 39 ALR3d 1332.

Construction of provision as to which of 2 or more parties shall be deemed the survivor in case of death simultaneously, in a common disaster or within a specified period of time, 40 ALR3d 359.

§ 1-12-502.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered by Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present provisions, see §

2-7-101

.